Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-563
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Support Act:

(1) Council means the Aging, Alzheimer's, and Dementia Advisory Council; and

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services.

Laws 2022, LB752, § 32;

Laws 2026, LB867, § 14.
July 18, 2026